src/fst/morphology/stems/tags.lexc
!***********************************************************************
!! # XML Tags
!! E Uí Dhonnchadha
!***********************************************************************

! Multichar_Symbols
! 
! +XMLTag		! 
! 
! LEXICON Root
! 	XMLTags;

LEXICON XMLTags !!≈ **@CODE@**

!!!</lb>
%<%/lb%>+XMLTag:%<%/lb%>	#; 

!!!<p>
%<p%>+XMLTag:%<p%>	#;
!!!</p>
%<%/p%>+XMLTag:%<%/p%>	#;

!!!<title>
%<title%>+XMLTag:%<title%>	#;
!!!</title>
%<%/title%>+XMLTag:%<%/title%>	#;

!!!</Turn>
%<%/Turn%>+XMLTag:%<%/Turn%>	#;

!!!</speaker_turn>
%<%/speaker_turn%>+XMLTag:%<%/speaker_turn%>	#;

!!!</lesson>
%<%/lesson%>+XMLTag:%<%/lesson%>	#;

!!!</direction>
%<%/direction%>+XMLTag:%<%/direction%>	#;

!!!<caption>
%<caption%>+XMLTag:%<caption%>	#;
!!!</caption>
%<%/caption%>+XMLTag:%<%/caption%>	#;

!!!<head>
%<head%>+XMLTag:%<head%>	#;
!!!</head>
%<%/head%>+XMLTag:%<%/head%>	#;

!!!<body>
%<body%>+XMLTag:%<body%>	#;
!!!</body>
%<%/body%>+XMLTag:%<%/body%>	#;

!!!<span>
%<span%>+XMLTag:%<span%>	#;
!!!</span>
%<%/span%>+XMLTag:%<%/span%>	#;

!!!<text>
%<text%>+XMLTag:%<text%>	#;
!!!</text>
%<%/text%>+XMLTag:%<%/text%>	#;

!!!<doc>
%<doc%>+XMLTag:%<doc%>	#;
!!!</doc>
%<%/doc%>+XMLTag:%<%/doc%>	#;

!!!<corr>
%<text%>+XMLTag+Corr+Start:%<corr%>	#;
!!!</text>
%<%/corr%>+XMLTag+Corr+End:%<%/corr%>	#;

!!!<err>
%<err%>+XMLTag+Error+Start:%<err%>	#;
!!!</err>
%<%/err%>+XMLTag+Error+End:%<%/err%>	#;
%=%=%=NONE%=%=%=+Error:%=%=%=NONE%=%=%=	#;

%<s%>+XMLTag:%<s%>	#;
%<%/s%>+XMLTag:%<%/s%>	#;

!!!</div>
%<%/div%>+XMLTag:%<%/div%>	#;
%<div% type% %=% %'unspec%'%/%>+XMLTag:%<div% type% %=% %'unspec%'%/%>	#;
%<div% type% %=% %'unspec%'%>+XMLTag:%<div% type% %=% %'unspec%'%>	#;
%<div% type%=% %'section%'% n%=+XMLTag:%<div% type%=% %'section%'% n%=	#;

!!!<gap desc='english text'/>+XMLTag:<gap desc='english text'/>
%<gap%/%>+XMLTag:%<gap%/%>	#;
%<gap%>+XMLTag:%<gap%>	#;
%<gap% desc%=%'english% text%'%/%>+XMLTag:%<gap% desc%=%'english% text%'%/%>	#;
%<gap% desc%=%'german% text%'%/%>+XMLTag:%<gap% desc%=%'german% text%'%/%>	#;
%<gap% desc%=%'english%'%/%>+XMLTag:%<gap% desc%=%'english%'%/%>	#;
%<gap% desc%=%'french%'%/%>+XMLTag:%<gap% desc%=%'french%'%/%>	#;
%<gap% desc%=%'german%'%/%>+XMLTag:%<gap% desc%=%'german%'%/%>	#;
%<gap% desc%=%'spanish%'%/%>+XMLTag:%<gap% desc%=%'spanish%'%/%>	#;
%<gap% desc%=%'welsh%'%/%>+XMLTag:%<gap% desc%=%'welsh%'%/%>	#;
%<gap% desc%=%'glossary%'%/%>+XMLTag:%<gap% desc%=%'glossary%'%/%>	#;
%<gap% desc%=%'bibl%'%/%>+XMLTag:%<gap% desc%=%'bibl%'%/%>	#;
%<gap% desc%=%'table%'%/%>+XMLTag:%<gap% desc%=%'table%'%/%>	#;
%<gap% desc%=%'note%'%/%>+XMLTag:%<gap% desc%=%'note%'%/%>	#;
%<gap% desc%=%'contact_info%'%/%>+XMLTag:%<gap% desc%=%'contact_info%'%/%>	#;

%<l%>+XMLTag:%<l%>	#;
%<%/l%>+XMLTag:%<%/l%>	#;



!!!<TEI>
%<TEI%>+XMLTag:%<TEI%>	#;
!!!</TEI>
%<%/TEI%>+XMLTag:%<%/TEI%>	#;

!!!<teiHeader>
%<teiHeader%>+XMLTag:%<teiHeader%>	#;
!!!</TEI>
%<%/teiHeader%>+XMLTag:%<%/teiHeader%>	#;

!!!<Topics>
%<Topics%>+XMLTag:%<Topics%>	#;
!!!</Topics>
%<%/Topics%>+XMLTag:%<%/Topics%>	#;

!!!<Speakers>
%<Speakers%>+XMLTag:%<Speakers%>	#;
!!!</Speakers>
%<%/Speakers%>+XMLTag:%<%/Speakers%>	#;

!!!</Episode>
%<%/Episode%>+XMLTag:%<%/Episode%>	#;

!!!</Section>
%<%/Section%>+XMLTag:%<%/Section%>	#;
